District of Columbia statutes.
1-626.09

Contributions.

(a)

The District and each employee shall contribute to the defined benefit plan under § 1-626.05(1) the social security amounts mandated by federal law.

(b)

Each employee may voluntarily contribute to the deferred compensation plan under § 1-626.05(2) in amounts not exceeding the limits set by § 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c)

The District shall contribute an amount equal to not less than 5% of the base salary of each employee participating in the defined contribution plan under § 1-626.05(3). The District contribution shall be made not less frequently than quarterly and shall be placed in the Section 401(a) Trust established by § 1-626.11.

(d)

In addition to the contribution under subsection (c) of this section, the District shall contribute no less than an additional .5% of a detention officer’s base salary to the Section 401(a) Trust established by § 1-626.11. The contribution shall be made not less frequently than quarterly.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2609
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(g), 34 DCR 5079
Mar. 2, 1991, D.C. Law 8-190, § 2(e), 37 DCR 6721
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 301(b), 43 DCR 4569

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-627.9.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 301(b) of Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-226, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2584).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 301(b) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-2, February 19, 1997, 44 DCR 1590).

References in Text

Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code referred to in subsection (b) of this section is classified as 26 U.S.C. § 457.

Editor's Notes

Application of provisions of Law 11-198: Section 1001 of D.C. Law 11-198 provided that Titles I, II, III, V, and VI and sections 405 and 406 of the act shall apply after September 30, 1996.

Mayor authorized to enter agreements to modify health benefits contracts: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-611.03.